ja: フードタイプ: バラクラバフード; カウルネックフード; ドローストリングフード; ファンネルネックフード; ハーフジップフード; ドローストリングなしフード; オーバーサイズフード; 取り外し可能フード; スキューバフード; シュノーケルフード; その他
ro-RO: Tipul hotei: Glugă tip cagulă; Glugă tip guler amplu; Glugă cu șnur; Glugă tip guler înalt; Glugă cu fermoar pe jumătate; Glugă fără șnur; Glugă supradimensionată; Glugă detașabilă; Glugă tip scuba; Glugă tip tub; Altele
sk-SK: Typ kapucne: Kuklová kapucňa; Kapucňa s padavým golierom; Kapucňa so sťahovacou šnúrkou; Kapucňa s lievikovým golierom; Kapucňa s polovičným zipsom; Kapucňa bez sťahovacej šnúrky; Oversized kapucňa; Odnímateľná kapucňa; Scuba kapucňa; Šnorchlová kapucňa; Iné
nl: Capuchon type: Bivakmutscapuchon; Capuchon met col; Capuchon met trekkoord; Trechterhals-capuchon; Capuchon met halve rits; Capuchon zonder trekkoord; Oversized capuchon; Verwijderbare capuchon; Scuba-capuchon; Snorkel-capuchon; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta kapuljače: Balaclava kapuljača; Kapuljača s naboranim ovratnikom; Kapuljača s vezicom; Kapuljača s povišenim ovratnikom; Kapuljača s patentnim zatvaračem do pola; Kapuljača bez vezice; Predimenzionirana kapuljača; Odvojiva kapuljača; Scuba kapuljača; Snorkel kapuljača; Ostalo
zh-TW: 兜帽類型: 巴拉克拉瓦式連帽; 垂墜高領連帽; 抽繩連帽; 漏斗領連帽; 半拉鍊連帽; 無抽繩連帽; 寬大連帽; 可拆式連帽; 潛水連帽; 防風連帽; 其他
cs: Typ kapuce: Kapuce ve stylu kukly; Kapuce s rolákem; Kapuce se stahovací šňůrkou; Kapuce s trychtýřovým límcem; Kapuce s polovičním zipem; Kapuce bez stahovací šňůrky; Oversized kapuce; Odnímatelná kapuce; Potápěčská kapuce (scuba); Kapuce typu snorkel; Jiný
da: Hættetype: Elefanthue-hætte; Cowl neck-hætte; Hætte med snoretræk; Hætte med skorstenskrave; Hætte med halv lynlås; Hætte uden snoretræk; Oversized hætte; Aftagelig hætte; Scuba-hætte; Snorkel-hætte; Andet
ru: Тип капюшона: Капюшон-балаклава; Капюшон-хомут; Капюшон на шнурке; Капюшон с воротником-воронкой; Капюшон с молнией до середины груди; Капюшон без шнурка; Объемный капюшон; Съемный капюшон; Капюшон-скуба; Капюшон-труба; Другое
sv: Typ av huva: Balaclavahuva; Polokragehuva; Huva med dragsko; Skorstenskragehuva; Huva med halv dragkedja; Huva utan dragsko; Oversize-huva; Avtagbar huva; Scubahuva; Snorkelhuva; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta kapuce: Kapuca v stilu balaklave; Kapuca z drapiranim ovratnikom; Kapuca z vrvico; Kapuca z visokim ovratnikom; Kapuca s polovično zadrgo; Kapuca brez vrvice; Zelo velika kapuca; Odstranljiva kapuca; Scuba kapuca; Snorkel kapuca; Drugo
fi: Hupun tyyppi: Kommandopipohuppu; Savupiippukaulushuppu; Kiristysnauhallinen huppu; Suppilokaulushuppu; Puolivetoketjuhuppu; Huppu ilman kiristysnauhaa; Ylisuuri huppu; Irrotettava huppu; Sukeltajahuppu; Snorkkelihuppu; Muu
es: Tipo de capucha: Capucha pasamontañas; Capucha con cuello drapeado; Capucha con cordón; Capucha con cuello de embudo; Capucha con media cremallera; Capucha sin cordón; Capucha extragrande; Capucha extraíble; Capucha de buceo; Capucha tipo snorkel; Otro
vi: Loại mũ trùm đầu: Mũ trùm kín mặt (Balaclava); Mũ cổ đổ; Mũ có dây rút; Mũ cổ phễu; Mũ khóa kéo nửa; Mũ không dây rút; Mũ quá cỡ; Mũ có thể tháo rời; Mũ kiểu lặn; Mũ kiểu ống thở; Khác
it: Tipo di cappuccio: Cappuccio passamontagna; Cappuccio con collo ad anello; Cappuccio con coulisse; Cappuccio con collo a imbuto; Cappuccio con mezza zip; Cappuccio senza coulisse; Cappuccio oversize; Cappuccio rimovibile; Cappuccio scuba; Cappuccio snorkel; Altro
zh-CN: 兜帽类型: 巴拉克拉瓦式连帽; 垂领连帽; 抽绳连帽; 漏斗领连帽; 半拉链式连帽; 无抽绳连帽; 宽松连帽; 可拆卸连帽; 潜水风连帽; 防风连帽; 其他
lt-LT: Gobtuvo tipas: Balaklavos tipo gobtuvas; Drapiruotas gobtuvas; Gobtuvas su raišteliais; Aukšto kaklo gobtuvas; Gobtuvas su pusiniu užtrauktuku; Gobtuvas be raištelių; Padidintas gobtuvas; Nuimamas gobtuvas; „Scuba“ stiliaus gobtuvas; „Snorkel“ stiliaus gobtuvas; Kita
fr: Type de capuche: Capuche cagoule; Capuche col bénitier; Capuche à cordon de serrage; Capuche col cheminée; Capuche demi-zippée; Capuche sans cordon de serrage; Capuche surdimensionnée; Capuche amovible; Capuche scuba; Capuche tunnel; Autre
pt-BR: Capuz tipo: Capuz balaclava; Capuz gola boba; Capuz com cordão; Capuz com gola funil; Capuz com meio zíper; Capuz sem cordão; Capuz oversized; Capuz removível; Capuz scuba; Capuz snorkel; Outros
bg-BG: Тип качулка: Качулка тип балаклава; Качулка с падащо деколте; Качулка с връзки; Качулка с висока яка; Качулка с половин цип; Качулка без връзки; Овърсайз качулка; Сваляща се качулка; Скуба качулка; Качулка тип шнорхел; Друго
th: ประเภทฮูด: ฮู้ดแบบโม่ง; ฮู้ดคอถ่วง; ฮู้ดมีเชือกรูด; ฮู้ดคอเต่า; ฮู้ดแบบซิปครึ่งตัว; ฮู้ดไม่มีเชือกรูด; ฮู้ดโอเวอร์ไซส์; ฮู้ดถอดได้; ฮู้ดแบบสกูบ้า; ฮู้ดทรงสน็อกเกิล; อื่นๆ
tr: Kapüşon tipi: Kar maskesi kapüşon; Dökümlü yaka kapüşon; İpli kapüşon; Huni yaka kapüşon; Yarım fermuarlı kapüşon; İpsiz kapüşon; Büyük boy kapüşon; Çıkarılabilir kapüşon; Scuba kapüşon; Şnorkel kapüşon; Diğer
el: Τύπος κουκούλας: Κουκούλα balaclava; Κουκούλα cowl neck; Κουκούλα με κορδόνι; Κουκούλα funnel neck; Κουκούλα με μισό φερμουάρ; Κουκούλα χωρίς κορδόνι; Oversized κουκούλα; Αφαιρούμενη κουκούλα; Κουκούλα Scuba; Κουκούλα snorkel; Άλλο
nb: Hettetype: Balaklava-hette; Hette med vannfallskrage; Hette med snøring; Traktkrage-hette; Hette med halv glidelås; Hette uten snøring; Oversized hette; Avtakbar hette; Scuba-hette; Snorkel-hette; Annet
en: Hood type: Balaclava hood; Cowl neck hood; Drawstring hood; Funnel neck hood; Half-zip hood; No drawstring hood; Oversized hood; Removable hood; Scuba hood; Snorkel hood; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de capô: Capuz balaclava; Capuz de gola drapeada; Capuz com cordão; Capuz de gola funil; Capuz com meio fecho; Capuz sem cordão; Capuz oversize; Capuz amovível; Capuz de mergulho; Capuz snorkel; Outro
pl: Typ kaptura: Kaptur kominiarka; Kaptur z szerokim golfem; Kaptur ze sznurkiem ściągającym; Kaptur z kominem; Kaptur do połowy rozpinany; Kaptur bez sznurka ściągającego; Kaptur oversize; Odpinany kaptur; Kaptur typu scuba; Kaptur typu snorkel; Inny
de: Kapuzentyp: Sturmhaube-Kapuze; Wasserfallkragen-Kapuze; Kapuze mit Kordelzug; Trichterkragen-Kapuze; Half-Zip-Kapuze; Kapuze ohne Kordelzug; Oversize-Kapuze; Abnehmbare Kapuze; Scuba-Kapuze; Snorkel-Kapuze; Andere
hu: Kapucni típusa: Maszkos kapucni; Vízesésnyakú kapucni; Húzózsinóros kapucni; Garbónyakú kapucni; Félig cipzáras kapucni; Húzózsinór nélküli kapucni; Túlméretezett kapucni; Levehető kapucni; Búvárkapucni; Csőkapucni; Egyéb
ko: 후드 타입: 발라클라바 후드; 카울넥 후드; 드로스트링 후드; 펀넬넥 후드; 하프집 후드; 드로스트링 없는 후드; 오버사이즈 후드; 탈착식 후드; 스쿠버 후드; 스노클 후드; 기타